src/morphology/stems/determiners.lexc
LEXICON Determiners
alle:alle DET_jede__det ;
andere:andere DET_jede__det ;
beide:beide DET_jede__det ;
jede:jede DET_jede__det ;
solche:solche DET_jede__det ;
verschiedene:verschiedene DET_jede__det ;
manche:manche DET_manche__det ;
mehrere:mehrere DET_manche__det ;
viele:viele DET_manche__det ;
genügend:genügend DET_genügend__det ;
was:was DET_was__det ;
selbe:selbe DET_selbe__det ;

der:d DET_d/er__det ;
ein:ein DET_ein__det ;
noch% ein:noch% ein DET_ein__det ;
kein:kein DET_ein__det ; !CHECKME
irgendein:irgendein DET_ein__det ; !CHECKME
mein+Det+PxSg1:mein DET_dein__det_01 ; !CHECKME
dein+Det+PxSg2:dein DET_dein__det_01 ; !CHECKME
sein+Det+Msc+PxSg3:sein DET_dein__det_01 ; !CHECKME
sein+Det+Neu+PxSg3:sein DET_dein__det_01 ; !CHECKME
ihr+Det+Fem+PxSg3:ihr DET_dein__det_01 ; !CHECKME
unser+Det+PxPl1:unser DET_dein__det_01 ; !CHECKME
Ihr+Det+PxPl2:Ihr DET_dein__det_01 ; !CHECKME
euer+Det+PxPl2:euer DET_dein__det_01 ; !CHECKME
ihr+Det+PxPl3:ihr DET_dein__det_01 ; !CHECKME
ander+Det:ander DET_dein__det_01 ; !CHECKME
sämtlich+Det:sämtlich DET_dein__det_01 ; !CHECKME
dieser:dies DET_dies/er__det ;
jener:jen DET_dies/er__det ;

LEXICON DET_was__det
+Det+Interr: # ;
+Pron+Interr: # ; !FIXME

LEXICON DET_d/er__det
+Det+Def+Msc+Sg+Acc:en # ;
+Det+Def+Msc+Sg+Dat:em # ;
+Det+Def+Msc+Sg+Gen:es # ;
+Det+Def+Msc+Sg+Nom:er # ;

+Det+Def+Fem+Sg+Acc:ie # ;
+Det+Def+Fem+Sg+Dat:er # ;
+Det+Def+Fem+Sg+Gen:er # ;
+Det+Def+Fem+Sg+Nom:ie # ;

+Det+Def+Neu+Sg+Acc:as # ;
+Det+Def+Neu+Sg+Dat:em # ;
+Det+Def+Neu+Sg+Gen:es # ;
+Det+Def+Neu+Sg+Nom:as # ;

+Det+Def+Pl+Acc:ie # ;
+Det+Def+Pl+Dat:er # ;
+Det+Def+Pl+Gen:en # ;
+Det+Def+Pl+Nom:ie # ;

!+Det+Def+Fem+Pl+Acc:ie # ;
!+Det+Def+Fem+Pl+Dat:er # ;
!+Det+Def+Fem+Pl+Gen:en # ;
!+Det+Def+Fem+Pl+Nom:ie # ;

!+Det+Def+Neu+Pl+Acc:ie # ;
!+Det+Def+Neu+Pl+Dat:er # ;
!+Det+Def+Neu+Pl+Gen:en # ;
!+Det+Def+Neu+Pl+Nom:ie # ;

LEXICON DET_manche__det
+Det+Qnt: DET_jede__det_01 ;
LEXICON DET_jede__det
+Det+Indef: DET_jede__det_01 ;
LEXICON DET_jede__det_01
+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>n # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>m # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>s # ;
+Msc+Sg+Nom:%>r # ;

+Fem+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>r # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>r # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom: # ;

+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>s # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>m # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>s # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>s # ;

+Pl+Acc: # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>n # ;
+Pl+Gen:%>r # ;
+Pl+Nom: # ;

!+Fem+Pl+Acc: # ;
!+Fem+Pl+Dat:%>n # ;
!+Fem+Pl+Gen:%>r # ;
!+Fem+Pl+Nom: # ;

!+Neu+Pl+Acc: # ;
!+Neu+Pl+Dat:%>n # ;
!+Neu+Pl+Gen:%>r # ;
!+Neu+Pl+Nom: # ;

LEXICON DET_genügend__det
+Det+Qnt: DET_genügend__det_01 ;
LEXICON DET_genügend__det_01
!!CHECKME, gender, number, case WITH ZERO morphology
+Msc+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat: # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen: # ;
+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ;

+Fem+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat: # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen: # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom: # ;

+Neu+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat: # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen: # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom: # ;

+Pl+Acc: # ;
+Pl+Dat: # ;
+Pl+Gen: # ;
+Pl+Nom: # ;

!+Fem+Pl+Acc: # ;
!+Fem+Pl+Dat: # ;
!+Fem+Pl+Gen: # ;
!+Fem+Pl+Nom: # ;

!+Neu+Pl+Acc: # ;
!+Neu+Pl+Dat: # ;
!+Neu+Pl+Gen: # ;
!+Neu+Pl+Nom: # ;

LEXICON DET_dies/er__det
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Acc:en # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Dat:em # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Gen:es # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Nom:er # ;

+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Acc:e # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Dat:er # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Gen:er # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Nom:e # ;

+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Acc:es # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Dat:em # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Gen:es # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Nom:es # ;

+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc:e # ;
+Det+Dem+Pl+Dat:en # ;
+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen:er # ;
+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom:e # ;

!+Det+Dem+Fem+Pl+Acc:e # ;
!+Det+Dem+Fem+Pl+Dat:en # ;
!+Det+Dem+Fem+Pl+Gen:er # ;
!+Det+Dem+Fem+Pl+Nom:e # ;

!+Det+Dem+Neu+Pl+Acc:e # ;
!+Det+Dem+Neu+Pl+Dat:en # ;
!+Det+Dem+Neu+Pl+Gen:er # ;
!+Det+Dem+Neu+Pl+Nom:e # ;

LEXICON DET_selbe__det
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Acc:n # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Dat:n # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Gen:n # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ;

+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Dat:n # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Gen:n # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Nom: # ;

+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Dat:n # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Gen:n # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Nom: # ;

+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc:n # ;
+Det+Dem+Pl+Dat:n # ;
+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen:n # ;
+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom:n # ;

LEXICON DET_ein__det

+Det+Indef+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>en # ;
+Det+Indef+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>em # ;
+Det+Indef+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>es # ;
+Det+Indef+Msc+Sg+Nom:%> # ;

+Det+Indef+Neu+Sg+Acc+Sw:%> # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>em # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>es # ;
+Det+Indef+Neu+Sg+Nom:%> # ;

+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>e # ;!
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>er # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>er # ;
+Det+Indef+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>e # ;!

LEXICON DET_dein__det
+Det: DET_dein__det_01 ;

LEXICON DET_dein__det_01
+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>en # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>em # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>es # ;
+Msc+Sg+Nom:%> # ;

+Neu+Sg+Acc+Sw:%> # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>em # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>es # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom:%> # ;

+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>e # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>er # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>er # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>e # ;!

+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>e # ;!
+Msc+Pl+Dat:%>en # ;
+Msc+Pl+Gen:%>er # ;
+Msc+Pl+Nom:%>e # ;!

+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>e # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Dat:%>en # ;
+Fem+Pl+Gen:%>er # ;
+Fem+Pl+Nom:%>e # ;!

+Neu+Pl+Acc:%>e # ;!
+Neu+Pl+Dat:%>en # ;
+Neu+Pl+Gen:%>er # ;
+Neu+Pl+Nom:%>e # ;!
